data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_BR.aff
SFX w   r        0            balir
SFX w   r        a            balir
SFX w   r        am           balir
SFX w   ir       íamos        balir
SFX w   r        as           balir
SFX w   r        da           balir
SFX w   r        das          balir
SFX w   r        do           balir
SFX w   r        dos          balir
SFX w   ir       íeis         balir
SFX w   r        mos          balir
SFX w   r        ndo          balir
SFX w   0        a            balir
SFX w   0        á            balir
SFX w   0        am           balir
SFX w   ir       íramos       balir
SFX w   0        ão           balir
SFX w   0        as           balir
SFX w   0        ás           balir
SFX w   0        des          balir
SFX w   0        ei           balir
SFX w   0        eis          balir
SFX w   ir       íreis        balir
SFX w   0        em           balir
SFX w   0        emos         balir
SFX w   0        es           balir
SFX w   0        ia           balir
SFX w   0        iam          balir
SFX w   0        íamos        balir
SFX w   0        ias          balir
SFX w   0        íeis         balir
SFX w   0        mos          balir
SFX w   r        s            balir
SFX w   r        sse          balir
SFX w   ir       ísseis       balir
SFX w   r        ssem         balir
SFX w   ir       íssemos      balir
SFX w   r        sses         balir
SFX w   r        ste          balir
SFX w   r        stes         balir
SFX w   r        u            balir
SFX w   uçar     úça          esmiuçar
SFX w   r        da           esmiuçar
SFX w   r        das          esmiuçar
SFX w   r        do           esmiuçar
SFX w   r        dos          esmiuçar
SFX w   r        i            esmiuçar
SFX w   r        is           esmiuçar
SFX w   uçar     úçam         esmiuçar
SFX w   r        mos          esmiuçar
SFX w   r        ndo          esmiuçar
SFX w   0        a            esmiuçar
SFX w   0        á            esmiuçar
SFX w   0        am           esmiuçar
SFX w   ar       áramos       esmiuçar
SFX w   0        ão           esmiuçar
SFX w   0        as           esmiuçar
SFX w   0        ás           esmiuçar
SFX w   0        des          esmiuçar
SFX w   0        ei           esmiuçar
SFX w   0        eis          esmiuçar
SFX w   ar       áreis        esmiuçar
SFX w   0        em           esmiuçar
SFX w   0        emos         esmiuçar
SFX w   0        es           esmiuçar
SFX w   0        ia           esmiuçar
SFX w   0        iam          esmiuçar
SFX w   0        íamos        esmiuçar
SFX w   0        ias          esmiuçar
SFX w   0        íeis         esmiuçar
SFX w   0        mos          esmiuçar
SFX w   uçar     úças         esmiuçar
SFX w   r        sse          esmiuçar
SFX w   ar       ásseis       esmiuçar
SFX w   r        ssem         esmiuçar
SFX w   ar       ássemos      esmiuçar
SFX w   r        sses         esmiuçar
SFX w   r        ste          esmiuçar
SFX w   r        stes         esmiuçar
SFX w   r        va           esmiuçar
SFX w   r        vam          esmiuçar
SFX w   ar       ávamos       esmiuçar
SFX w   r        vas          esmiuçar
SFX w   ar       áveis        esmiuçar
SFX w   uçar     úce          esmiuçar
SFX w   çar      cei          esmiuçar
SFX w   çar      ceis         esmiuçar
SFX w   uçar     úcem         esmiuçar
SFX w   çar      cemos        esmiuçar
SFX w   uçar     úces         esmiuçar
SFX w   uçar     úço          esmiuçar
SFX w   ar       ou           esmiuçar
SFX w   ir       e            bramir
SFX w   ir       em           bramir
SFX w   ir       es           bramir
SFX w   r        bramir       bramir
SFX w   r        a            bramir
SFX w   r        am           bramir
SFX w   ir       íamos        bramir
SFX w   r        as           bramir
SFX w   r        da           bramir
SFX w   r        das          bramir
SFX w   r        do           bramir
SFX w   r        dos          bramir
SFX w   ir       íeis         bramir
SFX w   r        mos          bramir
SFX w   r        ndo          bramir
SFX w   0        bramir       bramir
SFX w   0        a            bramir
SFX w   0        á            bramir
SFX w   0        am           bramir
SFX w   ir       íramos       bramir
SFX w   0        ão           bramir
SFX w   0        as           bramir
SFX w   0        ás           bramir
SFX w   0        des          bramir
SFX w   0        ei           bramir
SFX w   0        eis          bramir
SFX w   ir       íreis        bramir
SFX w   0        em           bramir
SFX w   0        emos         bramir
SFX w   0        es           bramir
SFX w   0        ia           bramir
SFX w   0        iam          bramir
SFX w   0        íamos        bramir
SFX w   0        ias          bramir
SFX w   0        íeis         bramir
SFX w   0        mos          bramir
SFX w   r        s            bramir
SFX w   r        sse          bramir
SFX w   ir       ísseis       bramir
SFX w   r        ssem         bramir
SFX w   ir       íssemos      bramir
SFX w   r        sses         bramir
SFX w   r        ste          bramir
SFX w   r        stes         bramir
SFX w   r        u            bramir
SFX w   r        0            bramir
