data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_BR.dic
aprazer/wMbjÂ
balir/wMjL
bramir/wMjLÀ
comprazer/wMjLÂ
desmiuçar/wYMjL
desprazer/wMjL
esmiuçar/wYMjL
faiscar/wYMjLÀ
resfolegar/wYMjL
